District of Columbia statutes.
9-811

Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions of the words and phrases used in this chapter shall be the definitions assigned to such words and phrases by the Civil Aeronautics Act of 1938, as amended.

Sept. 7, 1950, 64 Stat. 772, ch. 905, § 11

History

1981 Ed., § 7-1211.
1973 Ed., § 7-1411.

Prior Codifications

The Civil Aeronautics Act of 1938, as amended, referred to at the end of this section, formerly codified as 49 U.S.C. App. § 1301 et seq., has been repealed.

References in Text